Indiana, session 2026, HB1073.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026] (a) Of the eighteen
million dollars ($18,000,000) appropriated to the state police
department for forensic and health sciences laboratories in
SECTION 4(B) of P.L.213-2025 (HEA 1001-2025) for the state
fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027, the
state police department shall use two million five hundred
thousand dollars ($2,500,000) to process rape kits and to eliminate
the backlog of untested rape kits.
(b) Funds disbursed under subsection (a) may be used to:
(1) purchase equipment, including robots, used to process
rape kits;
(2) process rape kits;
(3) hire staff;
(4) provide competitive wages for employees; and
(5) pay costs associated with streamlining the processing of
rape kits;
to eliminate the backlog of untested rape kits.
(c) The state police department may make grants to law
2026 IN 1073—LS 6468/DI 107


enforcement agencies and testing labs, including the crime lab
within the state police department, to eliminate the backlog of
untested rape kits.
(d) Before October 1, 2027, the state police department shall
report to the general assembly:
(1) the status of the backlog of untested rape kits in Indiana;
and
(2) how funds under subsection (a) were directed to eliminate
the backlog of untested rape kits for the prior calendar year.
The report to the general assembly must be in an electronic format
under IC 5-14-6.
(e) This SECTION expires December 31, 2027.
2026 IN 1073—LS 6468/DI 107